Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 12. Miscellaneous Provisions.

§79-13-1201.
Uniformity of application and construction.

This chapter shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting it.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 1201, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2005.

Alabama Code, §§ 10-8A-101 through 10-8A-1109.

Arkansas Code Annotated, §§ 4-46-101 through 4-46-1207.

Florida Annotated Statutes, §§ 620.81001 through 620.9902.

Georgia Code Annotated, §§ 14-8-1 through 14-8-64.

North Carolina General Statutes, §§ 59-31 through 59-73.

South Carolina Code Annotated, §§ 33-41-10 through 33-41-1330.

Tennessee Code Annotated, §§ 61-1-101 through 61-1-1208.

Texas Annotated Statutes, Article §§ 152.001 through 152.914.

§79-13-1202.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Partnership Act (1997).

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 1202, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2005.

§79-13-1203.
Severability clause.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 1203, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2005.

§79-13-1204.
Reserved.

Reserved.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 1204, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2005.

§79-13-1205.
Applicability.

Before January 1, 2007, this chapter governs only a partnership formed:

After January 1, 2005, except a partnership that is continuing the business of a dissolved partnership under the Mississippi Uniform Partnership Law in effect on December 31, 2004; and

Before January 1, 2005, that elects, as provided by subsection (c), to be governed by this chapter.

On and after January 1, 2007, this chapter governs all partnerships.

Before January 1, 2007, a partnership voluntarily may elect, in the manner provided in its partnership agreement or by law for amending the partnership agreement, to be governed by this chapter. The provisions of this chapter relating to the liability of the partnership’s partners to third parties apply to limit those partners’ liability to a third party who had done business with the partnership within one (1) year before the partnership’s election to be governed by this chapter only if the third party knows or has received a notification of the partnership’s election to be governed by this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 1205, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2005.

Former §§ 79-12-1 through 79-12-119, which were repealed by Laws of 2004, ch. 458, § 1207, effective January 1, 2007, related to the Mississippi Uniform Partnership Law referred to in this section.

§79-13-1206.
Savings clause.

This chapter does not affect an action or proceeding commenced or right accrued before this chapter takes effect.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 1208, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2005.